Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-294
Compensation of directors.

(MBCA 8.11) Unless the
articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors
may fix the compensation of directors.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 94.